da: Type af bremsekaliberbeslag: Centermontering; Direkte montering; Flat mount; IS-montering; Post mount; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem da pinça: Fixação central; Direct mount; Flat mount; Fixação IS; Post mount; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da pinça: Montagem central; Montagem direta; Montagem plana; Montagem IS; Montagem post; Outro
zh-CN: 卡钳安装类型: 中心安装; 直装式; 平装式; IS 安装式; 柱装式; 其他
nb: Bremseklossfestetype: Senterfeste; Direktemontering; Flatmontering; IS-feste; Post-mount; Annet
lt-LT: Suporto montavimo tipas: Centrinis tvirtinimas; Tiesioginis tvirtinimas; Plokščiasis tvirtinimas („Flat mount“); IS tvirtinimas; „Post mount“ tvirtinimas; Kita
sk-SK: Typ uchytenia strmeňa: Stredový úchyt; Priamy úchyt; Plochý úchyt; Úchyt IS; Stĺpikový úchyt; Iné
cs: Typ uchycení třmenu: Středové uchycení; Přímé uchycení; Flat mount; IS mount; Post mount; Jiné
tr: Kaliper montaj tipi: Orta montaj; Doğrudan montaj; Düz montaj; IS montajı; Post mount; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve čeljusti: Sredinska namestitev; Neposredna namestitev; Ploska namestitev; Namestitev IS; Namestitev Post mount; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže čeljusti: Središnji nosač; Izravni nosač; Ravni nosač; Nosač IS; Stupni nosač; Ostalo
en: Caliper mount type: Center mount; Direct mount; Flat mount; IS mount; Post mount; Other
sv: Typ av bromsoksfäste: Centrumfäste; Direktfäste; Platt fäste (flat mount); IS-fäste; Stolpfäste (post mount); Övrigt
vi: Loại giá đỡ kẹp phanh: Gắn ở giữa; Gắn trực tiếp; Gắn phẳng; Ngàm IS; Ngàm dọc; Khác
ko: 캘리퍼 장착 방식: 센터 마운트; 다이렉트 마운트; 플랫 마운트; IS 마운트; 포스트 마운트; 기타
fi: Jarrusatulan kiinnitystyyppi: Keskikiinnitys; Suorakiinnitys; Flat mount -kiinnitys; IS-kiinnitys; Post mount -kiinnitys; Muu
hu: Féknyereg rögzítési típusa: Középső rögzítés; Közvetlen rögzítés; Lapos rögzítés; IS rögzítés; Oszlopos rögzítés; Egyéb
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งคาลิเปอร์: ยึดกลาง; ยึดตรง; ยึดแบบ Flat mount; ยึดแบบ IS mount; ยึดแบบ Post mount; อื่นๆ
nl: Remklauw montagetype: Center-mount; Direct-mount; Flat-mount; IS-mount; Post-mount; Overig
fr: Type de montage de l’étrier: Fixation centrale; Fixation directe; Flat mount; Fixation IS; Fixation Post mount; Autre
es: Tipo de montaje de la pinza de freno: Montaje central; Montaje directo; Montaje plano; Montaje IS; Montaje tipo poste; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de montare a etrierului: Montare centrală; Montare directă; Montare plată; Montare IS; Montare Post mount; Altele
ja: キャリパーマウントタイプ: センターマウント; ダイレクトマウント; フラットマウント; ISマウント; ポストマウント; その他
de: Bremssattel-Montageart: Center Mount; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS-Mount; Post Mount; Sonstige
el: Τύπος βάσης δαγκάνας: Κεντρική βάση; Απευθείας βάση; Επίπεδη βάση; Βάση IS; Βάση Post; Άλλο
it: Tipo di montaggio calibro: Montaggio centrale; Montaggio diretto; Flat mount; Montaggio IS; Post mount; Altro
ru: Тип крепления суппорта: Центральное крепление; Прямое крепление; Flat mount; Крепление IS; Post mount; Другое
pl: Typ mocowania zacisku: Mocowanie centralne; Mocowanie Direct mount; Mocowanie Flat mount; Mocowanie IS; Mocowanie Post mount; Inne
zh-TW: 卡鉗安裝類型: 置中安裝; 直接安裝; 平面安裝; IS 安裝; 柱式安裝; 其他
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на спирачен апарат: Централен монтаж; Директен монтаж; Плосък монтаж; IS монтаж; Post монтаж; Други